Massachusetts, session 194th, H3150.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subparagraph (19) of paragraph (a) of section 3 of chapter 62 of the general laws, as
appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words:-“established
by the commonwealth or an instrumentality or authority of the commonwealth” and inserting in
place thereof the following:- “established by the commonwealth or any authority authorized
under U.S.C. 529”
of 1